Maryland, session 2025, HB0264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–912.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE, REGISTRATION,
PERMIT, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION THAT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0264*

HOUSE BILL 264
(I) IS ISSUED BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(II) IS SUBJECT TO SUSPENSION, REVOCATION, FORFEITURE,
OR TERMINATION BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY; AND
(III) IS NECESSARY FOR A PERSON TO PRACTICE OR ENGAGE IN
A PARTICULAR BUSINESS, OCCUPATION, OR PROFESSION.
(3) “LICENSEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYER HOLDING A VALID LICENSE.
(4) (I) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS A UNIT OF THE DIVISION
OF OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL LICENSING IN THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(II) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” INCLUDES:
1. THE ELEVATOR SAFETY REVIEW BOARD;
2. THE MARYLAND HOME IMPROVEMENT COMMISSION;
3. THE STATE BOARD OF ELECTRICIANS;
4. THE STATE BOARD OF HEATING, VENTILATION,
AIR–CONDITIONING, AND REFRIGERATION CONTRACTORS; AND
5. THE STATE BOARD OF PLUMBING.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICABLE LICENSING
AUTHORITY WHEN A LICENSEE IS FOUND IN VIOLATION OF § 3–903 OR § 3–904 OF
THIS SUBTITLE BY A FINAL ORDER OF A COURT OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT AND
HAS NOT PAID:
(1) ALL PENALTIES ASSESSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE
FOR A VIOLATION OF § 3–903 OR § 3–904 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF THE FINAL ORDER OF A
COURT OR ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT, ALL RESTITUTION OWED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
3–907 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR FAILING TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY AN EMPLOYEE.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IF A LICENSING
AUTHORITY RECEIVES A NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS

HOUSE BILL 264 3
SECTION, THE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE LICENSE OF
THE LICENSEE.
(D) (1) BEFORE SUSPENDING OR REVOKING A LICENSE UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL SEND WRITTEN
NOTICE OF THE PROPOSED ACTION TO THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE IS SUBJECT
TO SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION, INCLUDING NOTICE OF THE LICENSEE’S RIGHT TO
CONTEST THE IDENTITY OF THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE IS TO BE SUSPENDED OR
REVOKED.
(2) (I) A LICENSEE MAY APPEAL A DECISION OF A LICENSING
AUTHORITY TO SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(II) AT A HEARING INITIATED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
ISSUE SHALL BE LIMITED TO WHETHER THE COMMISSIONER HAS MISTAKEN THE
IDENTITY OF THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE HAS BEEN SUSPENDED OR REVOKED.
(E) (1) A LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY NOT REINSTATE A LICENSE THAT
HAS BEEN SUSPENDED OR REVOKED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
UNTIL THE COMMISSIONER PROVIDES NOTICE TO THE LICENSING AUTHORITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY
WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSIONER FIRST RECEIVES:
(I) A COURT ORDER TO REINSTATE THE LICENSE; OR
(II) WITH RESPECT TO A LICENSEE WHO IS SUBJECT TO A FINAL
ORDER OF A COURT OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT TO PAY PENALTIES OR
RESTITUTION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 3–903 OR § 3–904 OF THIS SUBTITLE, NOTICE
THAT THE LICENSEE HAS PAID ALL PENALTIES AND RESTITUTION IN FULL.
(3) A LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL IMMEDIATELY REINSTATE ANY
LICENSE SUSPENDED OR REVOKED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IF:
(I) NOTIFIED BY THE COMMISSIONER THAT THE LICENSE
SHOULD BE REINSTATED; AND
(II) THE LICENSEE OTHERWISE QUALIFIES FOR THE LICENSE.

HOUSE BILL 264
(F) (1) ADVERSE LICENSING ACTIONS TAKEN UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
BE IMPOSED IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ACTIONS TAKEN IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) ADVERSE LICENSING ACTIONS TAKEN UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE IN EFFECT AGAINST:
(I) ANY SUCCESSOR CORPORATION OR BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
1. HAS ONE OR MORE OF THE SAME PRINCIPALS OR
OFFICERS AS THE LICENSEE AGAINST WHOM THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN,
UNLESS THE PRINCIPAL OR OFFICER DID NOT OR, WITH THE EXERCISE OF
REASONABLE DILIGENCE, COULD NOT HAVE KNOWN OF THE VIOLATION FOR WHICH
THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN; AND
2. IS ENGAGED IN OR INTENDS TO ENGAGE IN THE SAME
OR EQUIVALENT TRADE OR ACTIVITY; AND
(II) ANY INDIVIDUAL LICENSEE THAT WAS AN OFFICER,
DIRECTOR, CONTROLLING SHAREHOLDER, PARTNER, OR MANAGER OF THE
EMPLOYER AGAINST WHOM THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN UNLESS THE
OFFICER, DIRECTOR, CONTROLLING SHAREHOLDER, PARTNER, OR MANAGER DID
NOT OR, WITH THE EXERCISE OF REASONABLE DILIGENCE, COULD NOT HAVE KNOWN
OF THE VIOLATION FOR WHICH THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.